Idaho, session 2025, S1087.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 73, Title 39, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 73
MISCELLANEOUS HEALTH PROVISIONS
39-7301. COPIES OF MEDICAL RECORDS -- COSTS. (1) As used in this sec-
tion, "health care provider" means:
(a) A physician or other health care practitioner licensed, accred-
ited, or certified to perform health care services consistent with
state law or any agency or third-party representative of such practi-
tioner; or
(b) A health care facility or its agent.
(2) A health care provider shall provide one (1) free copy of a pa-
tient's medical records, including mental health records, if requested by
a patient, former patient, the patient's authorized attorney, or the pa-
tient's authorized representative to support a documented qualified claim
or appeal for benefits under any provision of the social security act.
(3) Any request made pursuant to this section shall be fulfilled within
thirty (30) days in an electronic format, if available. A paper copy may be
provided if an electronic format is unavailable.
(4) A health care provider shall be exempt from the provisions of this
section if the health care provider has less than fifty (50) employees, is
independently owned, and does not contract with a third-party service to
provide copies of medical records.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.